Utah statutes.
17C-1-104.   Actions not subject to land use laws.
(1)  An action taken under this title is not subject to Title 10, Chapter 9a,
Municipal Land Use, Development, and Management Act or Title 17, Chapter 27a,
County Land Use, Development, and Management Act.
(2)  An ordinance or resolution adopted under this title is not a land use
ordinance as defined in Sections 10-9a-103 and 17-27a-103.
